Illinois, session 104th, HB2921.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5changing Section 10.19 and by adding Section 10.21 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/10.19)7    Sec. 10.19. Local regulation of remediation, 8redevelopment, and improvements of inoperable State 9facilities. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an 11ordinance of a unit of local government may not be enforced 12against the remediation, redevelopment, or improvement of an 13inoperable State facility conveyed to a unit of local 14government for a recreational public purpose if the ordinance 15prohibits, restricts, or limits the remediation, 16redevelopment, or improvement of the inoperable State facility 17for a recreational public purpose. A unit of local government 18may not require payment of permitting fees or require permit 19inspections for the remediation, redevelopment, or improvement 20of an inoperable State facility conveyed to a unit of local 21government for the purpose of remediation, redevelopment, or 22improvement for a recreational public purpose.23    (a-5) For purposes of this Section, "unit of local   HB2921- 2 -LRB104 10962 HLH 21044 b1government" does not include a municipal wastewater agency or 2unit of local government that is organized under the Sanitary 3District Act of 1907, the North Shore Water Reclamation 4District Act, the Sanitary District Act of 1917, the 5Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act, the Sanitary 6District Act of 1936, the Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 71974, or the Eastern Will Sanitary District Act. 8    (b) This Section applies to remediation, redevelopment, or 9improvement projects that are ongoing on the effective date of 10this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and to all 11projects started on or after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly.13    (c) A home rule unit may not regulate remediation, 14redevelopment, or improvement of an inoperable State facility 15conveyed to a unit of local government for a recreational 16public purpose in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 17This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 18of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 19exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 20by the State.21(Source: P.A. 103-573, eff. 12-8-23.) 22    (20 ILCS 3105/10.21 new)23    Sec. 10.21. Local regulation of construction, 24reconstruction, improvement, or installation of State 25facilities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an   HB2921- 3 -LRB104 10962 HLH 21044 b1ordinance or regulation of a municipal wastewater agency or 2unit of local government that is organized under the Sanitary 3District Act of 1907, the North Shore Water Reclamation 4District Act, the Sanitary District Act of 1917, the 5Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act, the Sanitary 6District Act of 1936, the Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 71974, or the Eastern Will Sanitary District Act regarding the 8use of or connection to the wastewater treatment or collection 9system of the agency or unit of local government is valid and 10enforceable by the agency or unit of local government with 11respect to the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or 12installation of any State facility on or after the effective 13date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.